Maryland, session 2026, HB1645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
13–517.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1645*

HOUSE BILL 1645
(2) “Automated external defibrillator (AED)” means a medical heart
monitor and defibrillator device that:
(i) Is cleared for market by the federal Food and Drug
Administration;
(ii) Recognizes the presence or absence of ventricular fibrillation or
rapid ventricular tachycardia;
(iii) Determines, without intervention by an operator, whether
defibrillation should be performed;
(iv) On determining that defibrillation should be performed,
automatically charges; and
(v) 1. Requires operator intervention to deliver the electrical
impulse; or
2. Automatically continues with delivery of electrical
impulse.
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 25. AMERICAN LEGION AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR
GRANT PROGRAM.
20–2501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR (AED)” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 13–517 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(C) “GRANT PROGRAM” MEANS THE AMERICAN LEGION AUTOMATED
EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR GRANT PROGRAM.
20–2502.
(A) THERE IS AN AMERICAN LEGION AUTOMATED EXTERNAL
DEFIBRILLATOR GRANT PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1645 3
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE GRANT PROGRAM IS TO AWARD GRANTS TO
AMERICAN LEGION POSTS IN THE STATE TO PROCURE AND MAKE AVAILABLE AEDS
ON THE PROPERTY OF AMERICAN LEGION POSTS.
(C) AN AMERICAN LEGION POST THAT IS NOT ABLE TO PROCURE AND MAKE
AVAILABLE AT LEAST TWO AEDS ON THE PREMISES IS ELIGIBLE FOR A GRANT
UNDER THE GRANT PROGRAM.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ADMINISTER THE GRANT PROGRAM; AND
(2) IDENTIFY AND APPLY FOR FUNDING FOR THE GRANT PROGRAM.
(E) (1) IN AWARDING GRANTS UNDER THE GRANT PROGRAM, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL PRIORITIZE APPLICANTS IN ORDER OF DESCENDING NEED.
(2) AN APPLICANT THAT DOES NOT HAVE AN AED ON PREMISES
SHALL BE CONSIDERED TO BE OF GREATER NEED THAN AN APPLICANT THAT HAS
ONLY ONE AED ON PREMISES.
(F) THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN
APPROPRIATION TO THE GRANT PROGRAM.
(G) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
INCLUDE:
(I) A SIMPLE COMMON APPLICATION PROCEDURE; AND
(II) FOR ELIGIBLE AMERICAN LEGION POSTS, A PROCESS TO
FACILITATE THE PARTICIPATION OF AMERICAN LEGION POSTS THAT HAVE LIMITED
RESOURCES OR LANGUAGE BARRIERS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.